Connecticut, session 2026, SB00505.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective from passage) There is established a working group
2 to study the laws of this state concerning issues of criminal justice. Such
3 study shall include, at a minimum, a review of titles 18, 53, 53a and 54
4 of the general statutes for the purpose of recommending legislative
5 changes to said titles. The working group shall consist of the following
6 members who have expertise in criminal law and procedure and the
7 criminal justice system: (1) One appointed by the speaker of the House
8 of Representatives; (2) one appointed by the president pro tempore of
9 the Senate; (3) one appointed by the majority leader of the House of
10 Representatives; (4) one appointed by the majority leader of the Senate;
11 (5) one appointed by the minority leader of the House of
12 Representatives; and (6) one appointed by the minority leader of the
13 Senate. The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
14 General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to the judiciary
SB505 / File No. 595 1

SB505 File No. 595
15 shall serve as the administrative staff for the working group. Not later
16 than January 1, 2027, the working group shall submit a report on its
17 findings and recommendations to the joint standing committee of the
18 General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to the
19 judiciary, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the
20 general statutes. The working group shall terminate on the date that it
21 submits such report or January 1, 2027, whichever is later.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
JUD Joint Favorable
SB505 / File No. 595 2

SB505 File No. 595
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill creates a working group to study laws related to criminal
justice resulting in no fiscal impact to the state because the working
group has the expertise needed to meet the requirements of the bill.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
SB505 / File No. 595 3

SB505 File No. 595
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 505
AN ACT CONCERNING A STUDY OF THE LAWS OF THIS STATE
CONCERNING ISSUES OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE.